Vermont, session 2025-2026, H223.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 1061 is amended to read:
§ 1061. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1)(A) “Course of conduct” means two or more acts over a period of
time, however short, in which a person follows, monitors, surveils, threatens,
or makes threats about another person, or interferes with another person’s
property or residence. This definition shall apply to acts conducted by the
person directly or indirectly, and by any action, method, device, or means.
Constitutionally protected activity is not included within the meaning of
“course of conduct.”
(B) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1), threaten shall
not be construed to require an express or overt threat.
(C)(i) As used in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (1), “course of
conduct” includes use of any electronic, digital, or Global Positioning System
device to surveil a specific person or a specific person’s internet or wireless
activity continuously for 12 hours or more or on two or more occasions over a
period of time, however short, without authorization.
(ii) Conduct in violation of section 1165 of this title shall
constitute course of conduct for purposes of this chapter.
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 3 of 14
(2) “Emotional distress” means significant mental suffering or distress
that may, but does not necessarily, require medical or other professional
treatment or counseling.
(3) “Reasonable person” means a reasonable person in the victim’s
circumstances.
(4) “Stalk” means to engage purposefully in a course of conduct directed
at a specific person that the person engaging in the conduct knows or should
know would cause a reasonable person to fear for his or her the person’s safety
or the safety of another or would cause a reasonable person substantial
emotional distress.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 1065 is added to read:
§ 1065. ELECTRONIC TRACKING OF MOTOR VEHICLES
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Dealer” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 4.
(2) “Motor vehicle” has the same meaning as in 23 V.S.A. § 4.
(3) “Person” does not include the manufacturer of the motor vehicle,
provider of telematics equipment and services, or entities that rent motor
vehicles.
(4) “Starter interrupt technology” means technology used to remotely
disable the starter of a motor vehicle.
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 4 of 14
(b) Offense. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, no person
shall knowingly install, conceal, or otherwise place or use an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle without the consent of the operator
and all occupants of the vehicle for the purpose of monitoring or following the
operator, occupant, or occupants of the vehicle or direct any other person to do
so.
(c) Exceptions.
(1) It shall not be a violation if the installation, concealment, placement,
or use of an electronic tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by, or at the
direction of, a law enforcement officer in furtherance of a criminal
investigation and is carried out in accordance with the applicable State and
federal law.
(2) If the installation, concealment, placement, or use of an electronic
tracking device in or on a motor vehicle is by, or at the direction of, a parent or
legal guardian who owns or leases the vehicle, and if the device is used solely
for the purpose of monitoring the minor child of the parent or legal guardian
when the child is an occupant of the vehicle, then the installation, concealment,
placement, or use of the device in or on the vehicle without the consent of any
or all occupants in the vehicle shall not be a violation, unless the person
utilizing the tracking device has an active protection order against them for the
protection of any vehicle occupant.
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 5 of 14
(3) It shall not be a violation of this section if an electronic tracking
device is attached to stolen goods for the purpose of tracking the location of
the stolen goods, whether or not they may be transported in a vehicle, or if
installed, concealed, placed, or used in or on a vehicle as a vehicle theft
recovery device.
(4) It shall not be a violation of this section if an electronic tracking
device, including devices also containing technology used to remotely disable
the starter of a motor vehicle, is installed or used by a motor vehicle dealer in
connection with the credit sale, loan, or lease of a motor vehicle with the
express written consent of the vehicle’s purchaser, lessor, or lessee.
(5) It shall not be a violation of this section if an electronic tracking
device is installed or used by a business that is authorized to transact business
in this State and the tracking device is used by the business for the purpose of
tracking vehicles that are owned or leased by the business and driven by
employees of that business, its affiliates, or contractors of that business or its
affiliates.
(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a tracking system
installed by the manufacturer of a motor vehicle or a provider of telematics
equipment and services, installed or used by an entity renting out vehicles, or
installed or provided by an insurance company with the vehicle owner’s or
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 6 of 14
vehicle lessee’s permission to monitor driving habits for insurance rating
purposes.
(e) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than
one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both.
Sec. 3. 15 V.S.A. § 1111 is added to read:
§ 1111. USE OF VEHICLE
A plaintiff in a request for relief pursuant to section 1103 or 1104 of this
title may request possession of a vehicle for a set period of time. A court shall
grant a plaintiff possession of a vehicle if:
(1) the plaintiff’s possession of a vehicle is necessary to escape abuse or
future abuse; and
(2) the plaintiff:
(A) is the owner or joint owner of the vehicle;
(B) is the primary payor on the vehicle loan;
(C) has primary possession or control of the vehicle; or
(D) has been restricted from using the vehicle by the defendant.
Sec. 4. 15 V.S.A. chapter 21, subchapter 6 is added to read:
Subchapter 6. Disconnecting Vehicle Location Access
§ 1191. PURPOSE
Connected vehicle services that allow a person to view or track the location
of a vehicle can be misused to stalk or harass survivors of domestic violence.
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 7 of 14
The purpose of this subchapter is to establish a process whereby domestic
violence survivors can quickly terminate or disable an abuser’s access to a
vehicle’s connected services even if the abuser is the account holder.
§ 1192. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Abuser” means a person who has committed or allegedly
committed domestic assault, sexual assault, or stalking against a survivor or is
a defendant subject to a temporary or final relief from abuse order issued
pursuant to subchapter 1 of this chapter in which the survivor is the plaintiff.
(2) “Account holder” means a person who is a party to or a user of
services provided under a contract for connected vehicle service with a covered
provider, and includes a subscriber, customer, or registered user.
(3) “Connected vehicle location access” is a type of connected vehicle
service that allows a person who is outside of a vehicle, excluding a covered
provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to view or track the location of the
vehicle, including a location determined by a Global Positioning System
(GPS), whether through the internet, an app-based technology, or any other
remote wireless connectivity technology.
(4) “Connected vehicle service” means any capability provided by or on
behalf of a vehicle manufacturer that enables a person, excluding a covered
provider or vehicle cellular data provider, to remotely obtain data from, or send
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 8 of 14
commands to, a vehicle, which may be accomplished through a software
application that is designed to be operated on a mobile device.
(5) “Connected vehicle service account” means an account or other
means by which a person enrolls in or obtains access to a connected vehicle
service.
(6) “Connected vehicle service request” means a request by a survivor to
terminate an abuser’s access to connected vehicle service.
(7) “Covered provider” means a vehicle manufacturer or an entity acting
on behalf of the vehicle manufacturer that provides connected vehicle service.
(8) “Survivor” means a person who is at least 18 years of age who is the
victim or alleged victim of domestic assault, sexual assault, or stalking or who
is the plaintiff granted relief pursuant to a temporary or final relief from abuse
order issued pursuant to subchapter 1 of this chapter.
§ 1193. NOTICE
(a) A covered provider shall provide a prominent and clearly visible link
entitled “HOW TO DISCONNECT LOCATION TRACKING AND
REMOTE VEHICLE ACCESS” on its website to complete both of the
following transactions:
(1) Submit a connected vehicle service request.
(2) Obtain a new connected vehicle service account.
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 9 of 14
(b) A covered provider shall ensure that all communications provided
pursuant to this section are clear, concise, and written in accessible language.
It is imperative that drivers who are survivors receive support and clear
guidance throughout the process for submitting a connected vehicle service
request or obtaining a new connected vehicle service account.
§ 1194. PROCESS
(a) Notwithstanding an abuser being an account holder, a survivor may
make any of the following connected vehicle service requests to a covered
provider:
(1) to terminate or disable a covered connected vehicle service account
associated with an abuser; or
(2) to terminate or disable a covered connected vehicle service account
associated with the covered vehicle, including by resetting or deleting any data
or wireless connection with respect to the covered vehicle, and provide
instructions to the survivor on how to reestablish a connected vehicle service
account.
(b) A survivor shall demonstrate to a covered provider the authority to
terminate an abuser’s access to connected vehicle service by providing the
following:
(1) The vehicle identification number.
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 10 of 14
(2) Proof of legal possession of the vehicle, which may be a legal title to
the vehicle, or a dissolution decree, temporary court order, or domestic
violence restraining order that awards possession or exclusive use of the
vehicle to the survivor. A court order awarding sole possession or exclusive
use of a vehicle shall take priority over a vehicle title showing joint ownership
for purposes of this section.
(3) Proof that the survivor has been subjected to domestic violence.
Evidence may include:
(A) a copy of a temporary or final relief from abuse order in which
the survivor is the plaintiff and the abuser is the defendant, indicating that the
survivor has been granted relief;
(B) an affidavit from a law enforcement officer that there is probable
cause that the survivor has been the victim of a domestic assault, sexual
assault, or stalking in which the abuser is the alleged perpetrator; or
(C) a signed and notarized statement from a domestic or sexual
violence advocate outlining the following:
(i) the survivor is a victim of domestic assault, sexual assault, or
stalking in which the abuser is the alleged perpetrator;
(ii) termination of access to the vehicle service is necessary for the
survivor’s safety; and
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 11 of 14
(iii) the advocate has crisis worker privilege and a release to
provide this information.
(c) When a survivor submits a connected vehicle service request or request
to obtain a new connected vehicle service account, the covered provider shall
automatically send a confirmation email to the survivor acknowledging the
receipt of the request. This email shall contain a reference number for the
request and an outline of the subsequent steps in the process.
(d) Within two days after receiving a request, a covered provider shall
inform the survivor of the action taken, including, as applicable, whether an
abuser’s access to connected vehicle service has been terminated or if
additional information or proof of legal possession of the vehicle is needed.
This alert shall clearly state any relevant details or further actions required
from the survivor to complete a successful connected vehicle service request.
(e) If a connected vehicle service request is approved, the covered provider
shall provide the survivor with a clear explanation and guidance on how to
create the survivor’s own connected vehicle service account, if applicable, to
ensure that the survivor can maintain control over the connected vehicle
service once the abuser’s access to connected vehicle service has been
terminated.
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 12 of 14
(f) A covered provider shall not require a survivor to take any action to
terminate a person’s access to connected vehicle service other than what is set
forth in this section, including:
(1) the payment of a fee, penalty, or other charge to complete a
connected vehicle service request;
(2) maintaining or extending the term of a connected vehicle service
account;
(3) approval by any account holder, including the named account holder,
of the change in access; or
(4) an increase in the rate charged for the connected vehicle service.
§ 1195. PRIVACY
The following privacy protocols shall be followed in administering this
subchapter:
(1) If a covered provider terminated a person’s access to connected
vehicle service in response to a connected vehicle service request, the covered
provider shall not provide to the abuser any data or information regarding the
survivor, the vehicle, or any new connected vehicle service account that was
generated after the abuser’s access to the connected vehicle service was
terminated.
(2) A covered provider shall ensure that all personal information
provided during the process to terminate an abuser’s access to connected
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 13 of 14
vehicle service is handled with appropriate security and privacy, adhering to
relevant data protection laws and regulations.
(3) A covered provider and any officer, director, employee, vendor, or
agent thereof shall treat any information submitted by a survivor pursuant to
this section as confidential and shall comply with applicable privacy laws.
(4) A covered provider shall not share information submitted by a
survivor pursuant to this section with any third party without the affirmative
consent of the survivor, unless sharing that information is required to
effectuate a connected vehicle service request.
(5) Nothing in this section shall preclude a covered provider from
responding to a court order or warrant.
§ 1196. TECHNICAL INFEASABILITY
(a) The requirement to effectuate the requested action in subsection 1194(c)
of this section shall not apply to a covered provider if the covered provider
cannot operationally or technically effectuate the request.
(b) If a covered provider cannot operationally or technically effectuate the
request, the covered provider shall:
(1) promptly notify the survivor who submitted the connected vehicle
service request of that infeasibility; and
VT LEG #379280 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.223
2025 Page 14 of 14
(2) provide the survivor with information about whether the operational
or technical infeasibility can be remedied and, if so, any steps the survivor can
take to assist in remedying such infeasibility.
§ 1197. MISCELLANEOUS
(a) The termination of connected vehicle service pursuant to this section
shall not be deemed to impact legal ownership of a vehicle.
(b) This subchapter does not apply to vehicles owned or operated by a
rental company.
(c) A covered provider or any officer, director, employee, vendor, or agent
of a covered provider shall not be subject to liability for any claims deriving
from an action taken in compliance with this section.
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379280 v.2